fr: Gazéification: Fortement gazeux; Légèrement pétillant; Modérément gazeux; Nitro; Pétillant; Plat; Autre
ru: Уровень карбонизации: Сильногазированная; Слабогазированная; Среднегазированная; Нитро (с азотом); Газированная; Негазированная; Другое
en: Carbonation: Highly carbonated; Lightly sparkling; Moderately carbonated; Nitro; Sparkling; Still; Other
nb: Kullsyre: Mye kullsyre; Lett perlende; Middels kullsyre; Nitro; Kullsyreholdig; Uten kullsyre; Annet
es: Carbonatación: Muy carbonatada; Ligeramente carbonatada; Moderadamente carbonatada; Nitro; Con gas; Sin gas; Otro
zh-CN: 气泡程度: 强碳酸; 微气泡; 中度碳酸; 氮气; 气泡; 无气泡; 其他
da: Kulsyre: Meget kulsyreholdig; Let kulsyreholdig; Moderat kulsyreholdig; Nitro; Kulsyreholdig; Uden brus; Andet
hr-HR: Karbonizacija: Jako gazirano; Blago gazirano; Umjereno gazirano; Nitro; Gazirano; Negazirano; Ostalo
bg-BG: Газировка: Силно газирано; Леко газирано; Умерено газирано; Нитро; Газирано; Негазирано; Друго
th: ความซ่า: ซ่ามาก; ซ่าน้อย; ซ่าปานกลาง; ไนโตร; สปาร์คกลิ้ง; ไม่ซ่า; อื่นๆ
hu: Szénsavasság: Erősen szénsavas; Enyhén szénsavas; Közepesen szénsavas; Nitrogénes; Szénsavas; Szénsavmentes; Egyéb
pl: Nagazowanie: Silnie gazowana; Lekko gazowana; Średnio gazowana; Nasycona azotem (Nitro); Gazowana; Niegazowana; Inne
ro-RO: Carbonatare: Puternic carbogazoasă; Ușor carbogazoasă; Moderat carbogazoasă; Nitro; Carbogazoasă; Plată; Altele
fi: Hiilihappoisuus: Voimakkaasti hiilihapotettu; Kevyesti hiilihapotettu; Keskivahvasti hiilihapotettu; Typpihapotettu; Hiilihapotettu; Hiilihapoton; Muu
it: Carbonatazione: Molto gassata; Leggermente frizzante; Moderatamente gassata; Nitro; Frizzante; Naturale; Altro
sl-SI: Karbonizacija: Močno gazirano; Rahlo gazirano; Zmerno gazirano; Nitro; Gazirano; Negazirano; Drugo
vi: Độ sủi bọt khí: Nhiều ga; Ít ga; Ga vừa phải; Nitro; Có ga; Không ga; Khác
nl: Koolzuur: Veel koolzuur; Licht bruisend; Gemiddeld koolzuur; Nitro; Bruisend; Plat; Overige
lt-LT: Gazavimas: Stipriai gazuotas; Lengvai gazuotas; Vidutiniškai gazuotas; Nitro; Gazuotas; Negazuotas; Kita
pt-PT: Carbonatação: Altamente gaseificado; Ligeiramente gaseificado; Moderadamente gaseificado; Nitro; Com gás; Sem gás; Outro
zh-TW: 碳酸化程度: 強烈碳酸; 微氣泡; 中度碳酸; 氮氣; 氣泡; 無氣泡; 其他
el: Ανθράκωση: Έντονα ανθρακούχο; Ελαφρώς ανθρακούχο; Μέτρια ανθρακούχο; Nitro; Ανθρακούχο; Χωρίς ανθρακικό; Άλλο
ko: 탄산: 강탄산; 약탄산; 중탄산; 나이트로; 스파클링; 스틸; 기타
de: Kohlensäure: Stark kohlensäurehaltig; Leicht perlend; Mäßig kohlensäurehaltig; Nitro; Sprudelnd; Still; Sonstige
pt-BR: Carbonatação: Gaseificação alta; Gaseificação leve; Gaseificação moderada; Nitro; Com gás; Sem gás; Outro
sv: Kolsyra: Mycket kolsyrat; Lätt kolsyrat; Måttligt kolsyrat; Nitro; Kolsyrat; Stilla; Annat
sk-SK: Karbonácia: Silne sýtené; Jemne sýtené; Stredne sýtené; Nitro; Sýtené; Nesýtené; Iné
cs: Perlivost: Silně perlivé; Jemně perlivé; Středně perlivé; Nitro; Perlivé; Neperlivé; Jiné
ja: 炭酸: 強炭酸; 微炭酸; 中炭酸; ナイトロ; スパークリング; スティル; その他
tr: Karbonasyon: Yüksek gazlı; Hafif gazlı; Orta gazlı; Nitro; Gazlı; Gazsız; Diğer